Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 30

Transitory Vendors

62-30-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Merchandise” means any consumer item that is or is represented to be new or not previously owned by a consumer;

“Temporary premises” means any public or quasi-public place, including a hotel, rooming house, storeroom, building or part of a building, tent, vacant lot, railroad car or motor vehicle, temporarily occupied for the purpose of exhibiting stocks of merchandise to the public. Premises are not temporary if the same person has conducted business at those premises for more than six (6) consecutive months or has occupied the premises as the person's permanent residence for more than six (6) consecutive months; and

“Transitory vendor” means any person who brings into temporary premises and exhibits to the public stocks of merchandise for the purpose of selling or offering to sell the merchandise to the public.

Acts 1983, ch. 482, § 1.

62-30-102. Permit requirement.

Prior to conducting business in a county, a transitory vendor shall obtain a mobile vendor's permit from the county clerk of the county.

The transitory vendor shall furnish reasonable proof of identity and permanent address to the satisfaction of the county clerk and shall provide an adequate description of any motor vehicle or vehicles used in conducting business in the county, which description shall include the state of registration of the motor vehicle or vehicles and the license plate number or numbers assigned to the vehicle or vehicles.

The vendor shall also specify the dates, place or places and times during which business shall be conducted in the county.

Acts 1983, ch. 482, § 2.

62-30-103. Fees — Display of permits.

The county clerk shall charge a fifty dollar ($50.00) fee for issuing a mobile vendor's permit, which shall be valid for the dates, place or places and times specified.

The transitory vendor shall display the permit at the place where business is conducted so that it is visible to the public.

Acts 1983, ch. 482, § 3; 2001, ch. 228, § 1.

62-30-104. Exceptions from chapter.

This chapter does not apply to:

Any corporation, community chest, fund or foundation organized and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, literary or educational purposes of which no part of the new earnings benefits any private shareholder or individual;

State fairs, arts and crafts fairs and other fairs and festivals conducted primarily for amusement and entertainment;

Wholesale trade shows;

The sale of agricultural or handcrafted products;

A person who operates a permanent business, occupies temporary premises and prominently displays the business name and address while business is conducted from the temporary premises; or

Flea markets.

Acts 1983, ch. 482, § 4.

62-30-105. Administration by chief of police in certain counties.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the chief of police shall have full responsibility to administer this chapter in that county.

Acts 1983, ch. 482, § 6; 2001, ch. 228, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

62-30-106. Penalties.

Any person violating this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor and, upon first conviction of the violation, shall be punished by a fine of no less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who subsequently violates this chapter after a first conviction commits a Class E felony and, upon conviction of the violation, shall be punished by imprisonment for a term of no less than one (1) year nor more than two (2) years.

Acts 1983, ch. 482, § 5; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor and felony in this section has been designated as Class A and E, respectively, by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that offenses designated misdemeanors and felonies without specification as to category are Class A misdemeanors and Class E felonies. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.